Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1250
Bridges; rights of cities in adjoining states.

Any city in an adjoining state which has been properly authorized by the laws of that state or the United States, may exercise in the State of Nebraska any and all the powers granted in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252 to cities in Nebraska, subject to the conditions and requirements of said sections.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 26, p. 632;

C.S.1929, § 14-1226;

R.S.1943, § 14-1250.